Missouri, session 2026, SB1759.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein, for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 10.005. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service................................................ $652,333
Expense and Equipment...................................... 18,762
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 671,095

Personal Service................................................. 105,698
Expense and Equipment...................................... 53,805
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 159,503
Total............................................................... $830,598

Section 10.010. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director

2
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,401,586

Section 10.015. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For contracted staffing for: Fulton State Hospital, Northwest Missouri
Psychiatric Rehabilitation Center, the Forensic Treatment
Center, Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center, the
Higginsville Habilitation Center, Northwest Community
Services, and Southeast Missouri Residential Services
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................$15,000,000

Section 10.020. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$6,518,909
Expense and Equipment...................................... 305,736
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................6,824,645

Personal Service................................................1,317,826
Expense and Equipment...................................... 794,441
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................2,112,267

To procure and implement a multi-year, vendor-hosted,
integrated commercial off the shelf electronic health record
system for use in all of the department's hospitals and facilities,
provided thirty percent (30%) is allowed between personal
service and expense and equipment
Personal Service................................................. 648,233
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,490,054
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 4,138,287
Total.............................................................$13,075,199

Section 10.025. To the Department of Mental Health


For the Office of the Director
For staff training, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
from personal service to expense and equipment and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $659,140

Personal Service................................................. 231,677
Expense and Equipment...................................... 290,481
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 522,158

For the Caring for Missourians' Mental Health Initiative
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 551,705
Total..............................................................$1,733,003

Section 10.030. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For Employee Support Resources
For support services to DMH state operated facilities and office staff
Personal Service................................................ $396,636
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,269,650
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................$1,666,286

Section 10.035. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For funding insurance, private pay, licensure fee, and/or Medicaid
refunds by state facilities operated by the Department of Mental
Health
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $205,000

For refunds, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between federal and other funds
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 500,000
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109). ..........................100
From Mental Health Intergovernmental Transfer Fund (1147).......................100
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249).......................................100
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)...........................................100
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288)................................... 50,000
From Habilitation Center Room and Board Fund (1435). ....................... 10,000


From Inmate Fund (1540). ..................................................100
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926)...................................... 25,000
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930). .............................. 150,000

For the transfer payment of refunds set off against debts as required by
Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 25,000
Total............................................................... $965,500

Section 10.040. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Mental Health Trust Fund
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863). .................................. $150,000

Section 10.045. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For receipt and disbursement of donations and gifts which may become
available to the Department of Mental Health during the year
(excluding federal grants and funds)
Personal Service................................................ $587,347
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,925,000
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926)...................................$2,512,347

Section 10.050. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly provided the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they
shall be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service................................................ $156,157
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,462,390
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................$2,618,547

Section 10.055. To the Department of Mental Health
For Medicaid payments related to intergovernmental payments
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................$11,900,000
From Mental Health Intergovernmental Transfer Fund (1147).............. 6,600,000
Total.............................................................$18,500,000



Section 10.060. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
for providing the state match for the Department of Mental
Health payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$399,487,368

Section 10.065. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund to provide the state match for the
Department of Mental Health payments
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)...................$322,779,896

Section 10.070. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for Disproportionate Share Hospital
funds leveraged by the Department of Mental Health -
Institution of Mental Disease facilities
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................$50,000,000

Section 10.075. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For grant funding for the Crisis Counseling Program to provide
services related to presidential disaster declarations
Personal Service................................................ $123,430
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,402,374
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................$3,525,804

Section 10.100. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the administration of statewide comprehensive psychiatric services
and alcohol and drug abuse prevention and treatment programs,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$2,539,524
Expense and Equipment...................................... 75,388
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,614,912

Personal Service................................................1,693,360
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,885,784


From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................3,579,144

Personal Service................................................. 389,142
Expense and Equipment...................................... 270
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352).............................. 389,412

Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 65,684
Total..............................................................$6,649,152

Section 10.105. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For prevention and education services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................$16,529,737
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 82,148
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288).................................. 475,024

Personal Service
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352)............................... 36,960

Personal Service.................................................. 85,730
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,372,959
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,458,689

Personal Service................................................. 166,586
Expense and Equipment...................................... 285,607
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 452,193

For enabling enforcement of the provisions of the Family Smoking
Prevention and Tobacco Control Act of 2009, in collaboration
with the Department of Public Safety, Division of Alcohol and
Tobacco Control
Personal Service................................................. 342,077
Expense and Equipment...................................... 201,159
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 543,236

For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................8,000,000



For suicide prevention initiatives
Personal Service.................................................. 24,048
Expense and Equipment...................................... 829,806
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 853,854
Total.............................................................$28,431,841

Section 10.110. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Opioid Settlement Administration
For the reporting requirements pursuant to Section 196.1050, RSMo.
Personal Service................................................. $79,737
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... $84,737


Section 10.115. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Recovery Community Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,670,740
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352).............................1,681,787
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 1,200,000
Total..............................................................$6,552,527


Section 10.120. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Recovery Support Services
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................$1,835,879

For Recovery Support Services with the Access to Recovery Program
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 2,598,084
Total..............................................................$4,433,963

Section 10.125. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Addiction Medicine Fellowships
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................$1,000,000

Section 10.130. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health


For comprehensive psychiatric services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$1,574,946
Expense and Equipment...................................... 16,540,748
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................18,115,694

Personal Service................................................. 494,474
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,548,307
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................5,042,781

For adult psychiatric services, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility
is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections 10.130 and
10.160 to allow flexibility in payment for the Certified
Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment
System, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................29,449,407
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................48,024,854
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)......................................................... 849,315
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109). .....................1,310,572
From Missouri Crisis Services Fund (1344). ..............................22,357,560
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930). .............................2,426,903

For housing assistance for homeless veterans, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 255,000
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................1,000,000

For Shelter Plus Care grants
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................14,336,746

For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 625,021

Personal Service................................................. 275,338
Expense and Equipment...................................... 377,058

9
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 652,396

Personal Service................................................. 279,257
Expense and Equipment...................................... 21,213
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)....................................... 300,470

Personal Service
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352).............................. 141,572

For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections
10.130 and 10.160 to allow flexibility in payment for the
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective
Payment System, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................8,662,074
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................82,141,611
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)........................................................2,174,002
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352).............................8,172,347

For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse
From Inmate Fund (1540). .............................................3,513,779
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................6,084,022
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930). .............................. 963,775
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................6,040,316

For treatment of compulsive gambling
Expense and Equipment
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249)................................... 153,606

For the Substance Abuse Traffic Offender Program
Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288).................................4,495,353

For Housing Liaisons to provide Missourians with disabilities
assistance in securing housing and receiving supportive services
and to serve as liaison between tenants, housing providers, and
the department
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................2,500,000

10

For an organization serving a city not in a county and the surrounding
region to support prevention of opioid overdose
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................1,113,000

For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration, provided $100,000 be utilized for a
pilot project to distribute fentanyl test strips to community-
based organizations
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................5,100,000

For youth psychiatric services, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility
is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections 10.130 and
10.160 to allow flexibility in payment for the Certified
100 Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment
101 System, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
102 allowed from this section to Section 10.575
103 Expense and Equipment
104 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,895,742
105 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................6,923,541
106 From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109). ...................... 100,000
107 From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930). .............................1,406,879
108
109 For the Division of Behavioral Health to implement the use of EEG-
110 Guided Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation (e-TMS) equipment
111 for priority populations to include veterans, law enforcement
112 and first responders
113 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,117,297
114 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................2,117,298
115 From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 2,000,000
116 Total............................................................$294,562,933

Section 10.135. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the MOConnect System
For the maintenance and operation of the crisis module
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $498,750

For the maintenance and operation of the referral module

11
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 498,750
Total............................................................... $997,500

Section 10.140. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For reimbursing attorneys, physicians, and counties for fees in
involuntary civil commitment procedures, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,797,441

Section 10.145. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Forensic Mobile Teams to provide treatment to clients who are in
county jails awaiting court-ordered evaluations pursuant to
Chapter 552 RSMo and those who have been court-ordered for
competency restoration services in a Division of Behavioral
Health (DBH) inpatient facility pursuant to Chapter 552 RSMo
Personal Service...............................................$1,669,255
Expense and Equipment...................................... 405,333
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,074,588

Section 10.150. To the Department of Mental Health
For engaging patients in care coordination (EPICC) 24/7 referral and
linkage service for those residing in targeted regions, primarily
for individuals post overdose, but who also may present to
hospitals with issues relating to opioid, stimulant, and/or
alcohol use disorders to establish immediate connections to
recovery support services, and substance use treatment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................. $500,000

Section 10.155. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For prevention, treatment, and recovery programs at recovery high
schools
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................$6,834,783
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 3,600,000
Total.............................................................$10,434,783



Section 10.160. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse for payment of services to
Certified Community Behavioral Health Organizations,
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
subsections indicated in Sections 10.130 and 10.160 to allow
flexibility in payment for the Certified Community Behavioral
Health Clinic Prospective Payment System, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$25,943,592
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................26,483,077
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)......................................................... 316,129
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352)............................11,558,200

For adult psychiatric services and community programs, provided fifty
percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.130 and 10.160 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................199,113,638
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................294,882,049
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)........................................................1,942,304
From Missouri Crisis Services Fund (1344). ..............................18,500,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... 189,799

For youth psychiatric services and community programs provided fifty
percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.130 and 10.160 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and further provided that
CPR/CCBHO services for youth shall not be capped and
Medicaid supplemental shall be requested when necessary, and


further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................81,810,382
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................148,871,678
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159).................................................... 31,811,758
Total............................................................$841,422,606

Section 10.165. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a universal screening program used to identify maternal depression
and related behavioral health disorders including anxiety,
substance use disorder and depression
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)...................... $750,000

Section 10.170. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For 988 Crisis Response
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................$3,140,197

Section 10.175. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For administrative expenses related to the 988 Crisis Response
Personal Service................................................. $36,395
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,000
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... $41,395

Section 10.180. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
To pay the state operated hospital provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$12,010,000

For funding expenses related to fluctuating census demands, Medicare
bundling compliance, Medicare Part D implementation, and to
restore facilities personal service and/or expense and equipment
incurred for direct care worker training and other operational
maintenance expenses
Expense and Equipment


From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................4,438,909
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159).................................................... 400,184
17Total................................................................$16,849,093


Section 10.300. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Fulton State Hospital, provided fifteen percent (15%) may be
spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
facilities, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Fulton State Hospital Sexual Offender
Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program and Fulton
State Hospital, and further provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Sections 10.305,
10.310, 10.315, 10.320, and 10.325, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.575
Personal Service..............................................$56,722,455
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,092,271
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................69,814,726

Personal Service................................................. 998,482
Expense and Equipment...................................... 618,895
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................1,617,377

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 848,945

For the Fulton State Hospital Sexual Offender Rehabilitation and
Treatment Services Program, provided fifteen percent (15%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-


operated facilities, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Fulton State Hospital Sexual
Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program and
Fulton State Hospital, and further provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Sections 10.305,
10.310, 10.315, 10.320, and 10.325, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.575
Personal Service...............................................13,457,724
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,769,618
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................16,227,342

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 79,699
Total.............................................................$88,588,089

Section 10.305. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Northwest Missouri Psychiatric Rehabilitation Center, provided
fifteen percent (15%) may be spent on the Purchase of
Community Services, including transitioning clients to the
community or other state-operated facilities, and further
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Sections 10.300, 10.310, 10.315, 10.320, and 10.325,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$14,968,415
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,776,704
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................19,745,119

Personal Service................................................. 828,990
Expense and Equipment...................................... 105,903


From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 934,893

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 221,116
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 11,880
Total.............................................................$20,913,008

Section 10.310. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Forensic Treatment Center, provided fifteen percent (15%) may
be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
facilities, and further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.315, 10.320,
and 10.325, and provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$37,156,783
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,137,711
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................47,294,494

Personal Service................................................. 903,776
Expense and Equipment...................................... 93,210
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 996,986

Personal Service................................................. 339,345
Expense and Equipment...................................... 866,046
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288).................................1,205,391

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 396,532


From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 2,191
Total.............................................................$49,895,594

Section 10.315. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center, provided fifteen
percent (15%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community
Services, including transitioning clients to the community or
other state-operated facilities, and provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Southeast Missouri Mental Health
Center and Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center-Sexual
Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program, and
further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and
further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.310, 10.320,
and 10.325, and provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$26,748,143
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,149,933
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................33,898,076

Personal Service................................................. 307,474
Expense and Equipment...................................... 219,538
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 527,012

Personal Service
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926)...................................... 97,876

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 211,667

For the Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center-Sexual Offender
Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program, provided
fifteen percent (15%) may be spent on the Purchase of
Community Services, including transitioning clients to the


community or other state-operated facilities, and further
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center-Sexual Offender
Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program and Southeast
Missouri Mental Health Center, and further provided fifty
percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided fifteen
percent (15%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.310, 10.320, and 10.325, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................25,580,938
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,425,219
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................31,006,157

Personal Service
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)........................ 32,839

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 110,104
Total.............................................................$65,883,731

Section 10.320. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Center for Behavioral Medicine, provided fifteen percent (15%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated facilities, and further provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.310,
10.315, and 10.325, and provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$18,281,996
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,449,204
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................21,731,200



Personal Service................................................. 254,490
Expense and Equipment...................................... 633,697
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)....................... 888,187

Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288).................................. 416,100

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 319,756
Total.............................................................$23,355,243

Section 10.325. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Hawthorn Children's Psychiatric Hospital, provided fifty
percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided five percent
(5%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.300,
10.305, 10.310, 10.315, and 10.320, and provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$10,405,934
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,460,216
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................11,866,150

Personal Service................................................1,958,287
Expense and Equipment...................................... 197,901
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................2,156,188

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 85,861
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 7,629
Total.............................................................$14,115,828



Section 10.400. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the division administration, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$1,883,186
Expense and Equipment...................................... 52,145
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,935,331
Personal Service................................................. 495,798
Expense and Equipment...................................... 868,980
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 1,364,778
Total..............................................................$3,300,109

Section 10.405. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
To pay the state operated Intermediate Care
Facilities for Individuals with Intellectual
Disabilities (ICF/ID) provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$6,902,000

For habilitation centers
Expense and Equipment
From Habilitation Center Room and Board Fund (1435). ................. 3,417,038
Total.............................................................$10,319,038

Section 10.410. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
Provided residential services for non-Medicaid eligibles shall
not be reduced below the prior year expenditures as long as the
person is evaluated to need the services, and further provided
seventy-five percent (75%) flexibility is allowed between
sections 10.410 and 10.415
For community programs, including long-term care transformation
initiatives and efforts for reimbursement of providers based on
integration of key identified outcomes that produce value-based
care delivery models to improve quality and efficiency of the
total care delivered to individuals
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$981,126,293
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 1,754,440,315

21
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)........................................................6,180,260
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930). .............................1,015,000

For community programs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service................................................1,084,817
Expense and Equipment...................................... 34,671
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,119,488

Personal Service................................................1,174,385
Expense and Equipment...................................... 179,284
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................1,353,669

For statewide autism outreach, education, and awareness programs for
persons with autism and their families
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................13,131,599

For an Autism Center located in a city with more than fifty-one
thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 51,511

For services for children who are clients of the Department of Social
Services
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109). ....................11,591,223

For youth services
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109). ...................... 213,832

For Senate Bill 40 Board Tax Funds to be used as match for
Medicaid initiatives for clients of the division
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930). .............................5,889,538

For Autism Outreach Initiatives for Children in Northeast Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 51,511

For Regional Autism Projects
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 9,017,135
Total.......................................................... $2,785,181,374

22

Section 10.415. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For a designated provider (including a provider that operates in
coordination with a team of health care professionals) or a
health team selected by an eligible individual with chronic
conditions to provide health home services, designed to
coordinate care for individuals with identified health risks and
chronic health conditions receiving DD HCBS services,
provided seventy-five percent (75%) flexibility is allowed
between sections 10.410 and 10.415, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.575
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$8,282,633
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 15,039,089
Total.............................................................$23,321,722

Section 10.420. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the reimbursement of hospitals related to individuals who qualify
for placement and support through the Division of
Developmental Disabilities who may otherwise be eligible for
discharge but cannot be discharged due to a lack of availability
within an appropriate community placement. Such hospitals
shall provide a request for funding documenting these
individuals, length of stay beyond discharge, and effort to find
placement. The division shall on a pro-rata basis provide a per
diem reimbursement on an annual basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,000,000

Section 10.425. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For community support staff, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,490,956
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 8,955,829
Total.............................................................$13,446,785



Section 10.430. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For developmental disabilities services, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service................................................ $560,699
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,826,069
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 2,386,768
Total..............................................................$2,386,768

Section 10.435. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the
General Revenue Fund as a result of recovering the
Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled (ICF/ID)
Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901).........................................$2,447,105

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to Federal
Funds
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901)...................................... 4,454,896
Total..............................................................$6,902,001

Section 10.500. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Central Missouri Regional Center, provided twenty-five (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility
is allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$4,641,321
Expense and Equipment...................................... 145,918
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................4,787,239

Personal Service................................................. 723,014
Expense and Equipment...................................... 111,063
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 834,077
Total..............................................................$5,621,316



Section 10.505. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Kansas City Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505,
10.510, 10.515, and 10.520, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$4,409,346
Expense and Equipment...................................... 209,056
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................4,618,402

Personal Service................................................1,369,119
Expense and Equipment...................................... 111,945

From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 1,481,064
Total..............................................................$6,099,466

Section 10.510. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Sikeston Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility
is allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$2,423,346
Expense and Equipment...................................... 106,668
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,530,014

Personal Service................................................. 267,298
Expense and Equipment...................................... 27,735
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 295,033
Total..............................................................$2,825,047

Section 10.515. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Springfield Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided fifty percent


(50%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505,
10.510, 10.515, and 10.520, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$2,918,871
Expense and Equipment...................................... 137,069
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,055,940

Personal Service................................................. 423,301
Expense and Equipment...................................... 41,508
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 464,809
Total..............................................................$3,520,749

Section 10.520. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the St. Louis Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility
is allowed between sections 10.500, 10.505, 10.510, 10.515, and
10.520, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$6,710,914
Expense and Equipment...................................... 328,620
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................7,039,534

Personal Service................................................1,190,148
Expense and Equipment...................................... 246,273
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 1,436,421
Total..............................................................$8,475,955

Section 10.525. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Bellefontaine Habilitation Center, provided fifteen percent
(15%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated services, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.525, 10.530, 10.535,
10.540, 10.545, and 10.550, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575

26
Personal Service..............................................$10,534,797
Expense and Equipment...................................... 406,392
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................10,941,189

Personal Service...............................................12,126,353
Expense and Equipment...................................... 645,673
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................12,772,026

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,238,175
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 13,099
Total.............................................................$24,964,489

Section 10.530. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Higginsville Habilitation Center, provided thirty percent (30%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated services, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.525, 10.530, 10.535,
10.540, 10.545, and 10.550, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$6,301,906
Expense and Equipment...................................... 164,758
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................6,466,664

Personal Service................................................7,571,459
Expense and Equipment...................................... 366,749
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................7,938,208

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees


Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 551,428
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 87,789
Total.............................................................$15,044,089

Section 10.535. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Northwest Community Services, provided thirty percent (30%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated services, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.525, 10.530, 10.535,
10.540, 10.545, and 10.550, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$12,064,808
Expense and Equipment...................................... 535,124
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................12,599,932

Personal Service...............................................14,679,254
Expense and Equipment...................................... 618,733
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).....................15,297,987

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 965,004
Total.............................................................$28,862,923

Section 10.540. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Southwest Community Services, provided fifteen percent (15%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated services, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)


flexibility is allowed between sections 10.525, 10.530, 10.535,
10.540, 10.545, and 10.550, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$4,846,412
Expense and Equipment...................................... 93,401
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................4,939,813

Personal Service................................................5,866,062
Expense and Equipment...................................... 360,055
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................6,226,117

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 64,551
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 247,088
Total.............................................................$11,477,569

Section 10.545. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the St. Louis Developmental Disabilities Treatment Center,
provided thirty percent (30%) may be spent on the Purchase of
Community Services, including transitioning clients to the
community or other state-operated services, and further
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed between
sections 10.525, 10.530, 10.535, 10.540, 10.545, and 10.550,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service..............................................$10,584,759
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,990,761
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................12,575,520

Personal Service...............................................13,548,834
Expense and Equipment...................................... 718,822
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 14,267,656
21Total................................................................$26,843,176

29


Section 10.550. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Southeast Missouri Residential Services, provided thirty percent
(30%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated services, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.525, 10.530, 10.535,
10.540, 10.545, and 10.550, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service...............................................$5,132,404
Expense and Equipment...................................... 162,670
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................5,295,074

Personal Service................................................5,604,872
Expense and Equipment...................................... 633,384
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)......................6,238,256

For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 261,615
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 91,023
Total.............................................................$11,885,968

Section 10.555. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
To be distributed to programs promoting basic scientific
research, clinic patient research, and patient care for tuberous
sclerosis complex
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

Section 10.575. To the Department of Mental Health


Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1

Section 10.600. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Office of the Director
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $351,465
Expense and Equipment...................................... 15,326
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 366,791

Personal Service................................................. 625,522
Expense and Equipment...................................... 67,048
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .............................................. 692,570
Total..............................................................$1,059,361

Section 10.605. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service...............................................$1,015,828
Expense and Equipment...................................... 384,070
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,399,898

For program operations and support
Personal Service................................................3,629,358
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,982,510
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................5,611,868

Personal Service................................................. 353,200
Expense and Equipment...................................... 199,900
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)........................... 553,100

Personal Service................................................1,226,238
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,027,134
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)..............3,253,372



Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271)........................... 330,000

Expense and Equipment
From Mammography Fund (1293).......................................... 25,000

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646). .................................................... 44,571

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ............................ 30,000

Expense and Equipment
From Putative Father Registry Fund (1780). ................................. 25,000

Expense and Equipment
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824).................................... 30,000

Personal Service
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).......................320

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Veterans Health and Care Fund (1606)........................1,020,524

Expense and Equipment
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276). ........................... 50,000
Total.............................................................$12,373,653

Section 10.610. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the
Health Access Incentive Fund
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)...................................... $916,477

Section 10.615. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For the payment of refunds set off against debts in accordance with
Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)..................................... $50,000

Section 10.620. To the Department of Health and Senior Services


For the Division of Administration
For refunds
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $50,000

For refunds, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
federal and other funds
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)......................................................... 100,000
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271)............................. 9,240
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276). .................................. 5,000
From Mammography Fund (1293)........................................... 1,000
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)............................ 39,000
From Endowed Care Cemetery Audit Fund (1562).............................. 2,899
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565)............................................. 2,500
From Missouri Veterans Health and Care Fund (1606).......................... 51,000
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)............... 100,000
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646). .................................................... 10,000
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ............................ 15,133
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671). ....................................333
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694)......................................... 13,495
From Brain Injury Fund (1742). ..............................................100
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824)........................................25
From Missouri State Coroners Training Fund (1846)............................ 1,200
From Childhood Lead Testing Fund (1899). ........................... 275
Total............................................................... $401,200

Section 10.625. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly, provided the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they
shall be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service................................................ $130,765
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,000,001
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................3,130,766

33

Personal Service................................................. 120,264
Expense and Equipment...................................... 347,596
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ...................... 467,860
Total..............................................................$3,598,626

Section 10.630. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, in
accordance with Section 135.690, RSMo, to the General
Revenue Fund
From Medical Preceptor Fund (1260). .................................... $200,000

Section 10.650. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For cancer and chronic disease control, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $240,922
Expense and Equipment...................................... 875,872
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,116,794

Personal Service................................................. 629,909
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,075,641
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................3,705,550

Personal Service................................................. 153,179
Expense and Equipment...................................... 131,887
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824)................................... 285,066
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 26,241

For a grant program benefitting people living with amyotrophic lateral
sclerosis (ALS) and providing case services, including respite
care, care coordination, and clinical support
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 250,000



For Community Based Navigation Services for breast cancer screening
and treatment provided by a statewide community based not-
for-profit with experience supporting low to moderate income
individuals who are either in need of preventative screening
services for breast cancer detection and/or treatment for breast
cancer
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 500,000

For the Show Me Healthy Women program.
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 500,000

Personal Service................................................. 473,898
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,894,453
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................2,368,351

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)............................ 20,000

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ...................... 32,548
Total..............................................................$8,804,550

Section 10.655. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For communicable disease control and prevention, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650,
10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690,
10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730,
and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service...............................................$1,220,501
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,658,458
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,878,959

Personal Service................................................1,575,665
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,012,961
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................4,588,626



Expense and Equipment
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)........................................................4,340,875

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 121,787
Total.............................................................$11,930,247

Section 10.660. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For community health and wellness initiatives, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided seventeen percent (17%) flexibility
between personal service and expense and equipment within the
Health Initiatives Fund (1275) within this section, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $495,661
Expense and Equipment...................................... 20,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 515,661

Personal Service................................................1,030,405
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,821,136
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................7,851,541

Personal Service.................................................. 13,630
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,532,897
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................2,546,527
Personal Service................................................. 168,855
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,506,500
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)..............2,675,355

Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... 216,300

For the Adolescent Health Program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 21,228



Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................1,830,000

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................... 1,228

For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 800,000
Total.............................................................$16,457,840

Section 10.665. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For tobacco cessation services, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................ $100,000

Section 10.670. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For Community and Public Health administration, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650,
10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690,
10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730,
and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,827,325

Personal Service................................................1,216,450
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,474,645
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................2,691,095

Personal Service................................................. 100,000
Expense and Equipment...................................... 140,000
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ........................... 240,000



Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................1,338,536

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)...................... 59,000
Total..............................................................$6,155,956

Section 10.675. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For emergency preparedness and response, provided $1,000,000 be
used to assist in maintaining the Poison Control Hotline, and
further provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed
between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670,
10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710,
10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $298,422
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,200,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,498,422

Personal Service................................................2,302,169
Expense and Equipment...................................... 11,635,701
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143).......................................................13,937,870

Personal Service.................................................. 98,589
Expense and Equipment...................................... 24,472
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)........................... 123,061

Personal Service.................................................. 88,045
Expense and Equipment...................................... 23,785
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656)....................... 111,830

Expense and Equipment
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566). ................................... 500,000

For outbreak response
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)...................... 300,000
Total.............................................................$16,471,183



Section 10.680. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For environmental public health provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service...............................................$2,197,674
Expense and Equipment...................................... 206,075
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,403,749

Personal Service................................................2,399,047
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,101,278
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................5,500,325

Personal Service................................................. 361,920
Expense and Equipment...................................... 560,400
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)............. 922,320

Personal Service................................................. 467,430
Expense and Equipment...................................... 73,984
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)........................... 541,414
Personal Service................................................. 264,624
Expense and Equipment...................................... 66,884
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676)....................................... 331,508

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Lead Abatement Loan Fund (1893). ..............................200

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 179,986
Total..............................................................$9,879,502

Section 10.685. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For genetics and newborn health services, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,


10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $358,671
Expense and Equipment...................................... 696,320
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,054,991

Personal Service................................................. 555,398
Expense and Equipment...................................... 686,585
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................1,241,983

Personal Service................................................. 173,323
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,700,062
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)..........................1,873,385

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 10,585

For the SAFE-CARE Program, including implementing a regionalized
medical response to child abuse, providing daily review of cases
of children less than four (4) years of age under investigation by
the Missouri Department of Social Services, Children's
Division, and to provide medical forensics training to medical
providers and multi-disciplinary team members
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 250,000
Total..............................................................$4,430,944

Section 10.690. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For health informatics and epidemiology, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,329,570

Personal Service................................................2,551,228
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,399,209


From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................5,950,437

Personal Service.................................................. 57,865
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,671
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................... 63,536

Personal Service.................................................. 96,077
Expense and Equipment...................................... 68,048
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646). ................................................... 164,125

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 33,577
Total..............................................................$7,541,245

Section 10.695. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For human immunodeficiency virus, sexually transmitted infection, and
Hepatitis services, provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is
allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665,
10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705,
10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $255,441
Expense and Equipment...................................... 57,500
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 312,941

Personal Service................................................1,582,414
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,668,834
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................9,251,248

Personal Service................................................. 166,780
Expense and Equipment...................................... 319,977
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... 486,757

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 10,309
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................6,615,117


From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143).......................................................82,774,386

For the Ryan White program, provided the eligible income requirement
is at or below three hundred percent (300%) of the Federal
Poverty Level (FPL)
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 700,782

Personal Service................................................. 445,659
Expense and Equipment...................................... 100,166
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143).................................................... 545,825
Total............................................................$100,697,365

Section 10.700. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For Local Public Health Agency support, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $291,815
Expense and Equipment...................................... 28,500
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 320,315

Personal Service.................................................. 65,472
Expense and Equipment...................................... 82,140
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ................................................... 147,612

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)............................ 14,573

For core public health functions and related expenses
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................7,372,392
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159).................................................... 8,400,000
Total.............................................................$16,254,892



Section 10.705. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For supplemental nutrition programs, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ $7,960

Personal Service................................................4,628,871
Expense and Equipment...................................... 203,146,459
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .............................................. 207,775,330
Total............................................................$207,783,290

Section 10.710. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For rural health and primary care initiatives, including the Health
Professional Loan Repayment Program (HPLRP), provided
twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections
10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685,
10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725,
10.730, and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $302,998
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,000,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,302,998

Personal Service................................................. 253,267
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,285,781
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................2,539,048

Personal Service................................................. 126,920
Expense and Equipment...................................... 14,450
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)....................................... 141,370

Expense and Equipment
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276). ................................ 650,000



Expense and Equipment
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565)........................................... 158,900

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ..........................1,031,790

For the development of graduate medical education programs,
including but not limited to costs associated to creating and
maintaining a GME Technical Assistance Center, grants for
creation of new programs and expansion of existing programs in
facilities that take care of underserved and rural communities,
and grants for planning and other exploratory projects that
position a facility to sustain or increase graduate medical
education opportunities
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,501,120

For graduate medical program grants for specialty areas which provide
specific training for physicians to prevent, diagnose, and
manage substance use disorder/opioid use disorder, and for
associated costs to support technical assistance, new and
expanded GME programs, expansion of residency slots within
an existing program, and funding for planning or other
exploratory projects that position the state to increase graduate
medical education opportunities
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................5,000,000

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Board of Nursing Fund
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565)...................................... 100,000
Total.............................................................$13,425,226

Section 10.715. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For oral health services and initiatives, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735,


and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $99,214

Personal Service................................................. 591,922
Expense and Equipment...................................... 837,740
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................1,429,662

Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................... 3,687

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health Donated Fund (1658). ........................... 655,000

For the Elks Mobile Dental Clinic
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 200,000

For the Missouri Donated Dental Services Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 180,000
Total..............................................................$2,567,563

Section 10.720. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For minority health initiatives, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655, 10.660,
10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695, 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and 10.735,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $230,997
Expense and Equipment...................................... 181,121
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 412,118

Personal Service
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .............................................. 39,128
Total............................................................... $451,246



Section 10.725. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For women's health and wellness programs and services, provided
twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between sections
10.650, 10.655, 10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685,
10.690, 10.695, 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725,
10.730, and 10.735, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service................................................ $166,357
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,400
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 171,757

Personal Service................................................1,089,603
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,290,575
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................7,380,178

Personal Service................................................. 112,088
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,563,582
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................4,675,670

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................... 4,916

Expense and Equipment
From Justice for Survivors Telehealth Network Fund (1228).................... 100,000

For a statewide telehealth network for forensic examinations of victims
of sexual offenses
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,058,612

For contracts for Sexual Violence Victims Services, Awareness, and
Education Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143)........................................................1,287,134

For the development and implementation of initiatives to reduce
maternal mortality, including maternal quality control protocols,


a perinatal health access collaborative, maternal care provider
trainings, postpartum plans of care best practices, and a state
maternal and child health dashboard
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 2,175,000
Total.............................................................$17,853,267

Section 10.730. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For fetal infant mortality review services, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 10.735. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For vital records certification and issuance, provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between sections 10.650, 10.655,
10.660, 10.665, 10.670, 10.675, 10.680, 10.685, 10.690, 10.695,
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.715, 10.720, 10.725, 10.730, and
10.735, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950

Personal Service...............................................$1,387,744
Expense and Equipment...................................... 56,720
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,444,464

Personal Service................................................. 162,709
Expense and Equipment...................................... 787,754
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ................................................... 950,463

Personal Service................................................. 130,693
Expense and Equipment...................................... 25,724
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)........................... 156,417

Personal Service................................................. 110,956
Expense and Equipment...................................... 27,748

47
From Putative Father Registry Fund (1780). ................................ 138,704

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 11,371

For the finalization of updates to the Department of Health and Senior
Services Vital Records System, including necessary
infrastructure, security enhancements, and staff training
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)..........................1,763,000

For coroner trainings provided by the Missouri Coroners' and Medical
Examiners' Association
From Missouri State Coroners Training Fund (1846)..................... 355,482
Total..............................................................$4,819,901

Section 10.740. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
To address coronavirus preparedness and response, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus 2021
Fund (2457). .................................................. $360,783

To provide coronavirus mitigation efforts, including, but not
limited to, testing, tracing, reporting, and related expenses,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this
section
Personal Service................................................3,000,000
Expense and Equipment...................................... 70,472,380
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
(2350).......................................................73,472,380

For Epidemiology Laboratory Capacity – Advanced Molecular
Detection – Public Health Lab Preparedness, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus 2021
Fund (2457). ..................................................4,634,965



For Strengthening Healthcare Associated Infections and Antibiotic
Resistance Program Capacity, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act of
2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service................................................1,010,359
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,685,803
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus 2021
Fund (2457). ..................................................3,696,162

To provide COVID-19 mitigation and prevention efforts,
including, but not limited to, testing, vaccinations, reporting,
and public health workforce enhancement, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act
of 2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service................................................1,816,452
Expense and Equipment...................................... 35,433,359
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus 2021
Fund (2457). .................................................37,249,811

For the Disease Intervention Specialist Program to prevent the spread
of COVID-19 and other infectious diseases among vulnerable
communities, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in
this section
Personal Service................................................. 156,673
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,697,407
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus 2021
Fund (2457). .............................................. 2,854,080
Total............................................................$122,268,181

Section 10.750. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the State Public Health Laboratory,
including providing newborn screening services on weekends
and holidays, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service...............................................$2,577,649
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,137,683
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,715,332



Personal Service................................................1,262,010
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,298,268
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................3,560,278

Personal Service................................................2,077,479
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,494,336
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298)..........................8,571,815

Personal Service................................................. 521,744
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,968,131
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)..............2,489,875

Personal Service................................................. 158,666
Expense and Equipment...................................... 562,586
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679). ................................... 721,252

Personal Service.................................................. 56,057
Expense and Equipment...................................... 239,452
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... 295,509

Expense and Equipment
From Childhood Lead Testing Fund (1899). ........................... 65,017
Total.............................................................$19,419,078

Section 10.800. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service..............................................$15,379,274
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,333,490
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................16,712,764

Personal Service...............................................16,431,266
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,621,325
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .................................................18,052,591

For Medicaid Home and Community-Based Services Program
reassessments, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950


Personal Service................................................. 943,724
Expense and Equipment...................................... 866,186
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,809,910

Personal Service................................................. 943,723
Expense and Equipment...................................... 866,186
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................1,809,909

Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 31,150
Total.............................................................$38,416,324

Section 10.805. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For non-Medicaid reimbursable senior and disability programs,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $555,005
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................2,924,500

For special health care needs programs, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,834,778
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................1,145,238
From Brain Injury Fund (1742). .......................................... 974,900
From Champ W Smith and Mary C Smith Memorial Endowment Trust
Fund (1873). .................................................... 10,000
From Childrens Special Health Care Needs Service Fund (1950)............ 5,000
Total..............................................................$7,449,421

Section 10.810. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For providing consumer directed personal care assistance services at a
rate not to exceed sixty percent (60%) of the average monthly
Medicaid cost of nursing facility care, including payments to
providers for value-based payment initiatives, provided ten


percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Section 10.815 to allow flexibility within the Medicaid Home
and Community-Based Services Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$256,841,615
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .............................................. 466,816,847
Total............................................................$723,658,462

Section 10.815. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For respite care, homemaker chore, personal care, assistive technology,
adult day care, AIDS, children's waiver services, home-
delivered meals, Programs of All Inclusive Care for the Elderly,
the Structured Family Caregiver Waiver, Brain Injury Waiver,
other related services, and program management under the
Medicaid fee-for-service and managed care programs, including
payments to providers for value-based payment initiatives,
provided that individuals eligible for or receiving nursing home
care must be given the opportunity to have those Medicaid
dollars follow them to the community to the extent necessary to
meet their unmet needs as determined by 19 CSR 30 81.030 and
further be allowed to choose the personal care program option,
including the option of assistive technology, in the community
that best meets the individuals' unmet needs, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Section 10.810 to allow flexibility within the Medicaid Home
and Community Based Services Program, and further provided
that individuals eligible for the Medicaid Personal Care Option
must be allowed to choose, from among all the program
options, that option which best meets their unmet needs as
determined by 19 CSR 30 81.030; and also be allowed to have
their Medicaid funds follow them to the extent necessary to
meet their unmet needs whichever option they choose. This
language does not create any entitlements not established by
statute
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$251,050,744
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .............................................. 459,049,986


Total............................................................$710,100,730

Section 10.820. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Senior Services Growth and Development Program Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$8,494,746

Section 10.825. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For Home and Community Services grants to be distributed to the
Agencies on Aging, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between these services and meal services, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,074,704
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .................................................37,244,641

For distributions to the Area Agencies on Aging, in accordance with
Section 192.385, RSMo, which requires the deposit of a portion
of the premium tax collected under Sections 148.320 and
148.370, RSMo, to the Senior Services Growth and
Development Program Fund
From Senior Services Growth and Development Program Fund (1419)..........19,530,621

For meals to be distributed to each Area Agency on Aging, provided
that at least $500,000 of general revenue be used for non-
Medicaid meals to be distributed to each Area Agency on Aging
in proportion to the actual number of meals served during the
preceding fiscal year, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between these services and grant services, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................9,731,016
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................6,955,359
From Elderly Home Delivered Meals Trust Fund (1296). ....................... 62,958



For the Ombudsman Program operated by the Area Agencies on Aging
or their service providers
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 150,000
Total.............................................................$75,749,299

Section 10.830. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For a statewide caregiver training, education, support, and coaching
program to reduce the number of persons, including persons
with Alzheimer's disease, prematurely or unnecessarily
institutionalized and decrease caregiver burnout, including
support of assistive technology and devices for monitoring the
care of the recipient, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,200,000

Section 10.835. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For senior independent living programs that support seniors aging in
place in communities with a high concentration of older adults,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.950
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $200,000

Section 10.840. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For providing naturalization assistance to refugees and/or legal
immigrants who: have resided in Missouri more than five years,
are unable to benefit or attend classroom instruction, and who
require special assistance to successfully attain the requirements
to become a citizen. Services may include direct tutoring,
assistance with identifying and completing appropriate waiver
requests to the Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency,
and facilitating proper documentation. The department shall
award a contract under this section to a qualified not-for-profit
organization which can demonstrate its ability to work with this
population. A report shall be compiled for the General
Assembly evaluating the program’s effectiveness in helping


senior refugees and immigrants in establishing citizenship and
their ability to qualify individuals for Medicare
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $200,000

Section 10.900. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.950
Personal Service..............................................$13,646,271
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,167,707
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................14,813,978

Personal Service...............................................13,989,032
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,423,811
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). .................................................15,412,843

Personal Service................................................1,422,531
Expense and Equipment...................................... 286,589
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271)..........................1,709,120

Personal Service.................................................. 87,497
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,121
From Mammography Fund (1293)......................................... 100,618

For nursing home quality initiatives
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196).................. 725,000

For the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs operations and
support
Personal Service.................................................. 15,920
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,115
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 20,035

Personal Service................................................. 100,580
Expense and Equipment...................................... 11,192
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276). ................................ 111,772

Personal Service................................................. 303,472
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,700,000


From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)..................2,003,472

For activities and equipment that further promote Cardiac Emergency
Plan preparedness, but not limited to the purchase of AEDs and
AED maintenance, the purchase of CPR training kits or CPR
training of faculty and staff, basic first aid training and
educational materials
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ..................................2,000,000

For the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs for a Physician
Prescription Monitoring Program
Personal Service................................................. 170,488
Expense and Equipment...................................... 69,116
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 239,604

Personal Service
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... 120,128

For expending Civil Monetary Penalty funding on federally approved
nursing facility activities and projects
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271)..........................7,649,459

For the Time Critical Diagnosis Unit
Personal Service................................................. 464,203
Expense and Equipment...................................... 356,857
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 821,060
Total.............................................................$45,727,089

Section 10.905. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
The Quality Improvement Program for Missouri (QIPMO) to
provide technical assistance to nursing homes, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.950
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196)................$1,209,926

Section 10.910. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Cannabis Regulation


For medical marijuana program operations and support, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment
Personal Service...............................................$1,881,115
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,167,458
From Missouri Veterans Health and Care Fund (1606)........................5,048,573

For adult use cannabis program operations and support, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment
Personal Service................................................9,171,823
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,568,740
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608).............14,740,563

For grants to agencies and not-for-profit organizations, whether
government or community-based, to increase access to evidence
based low-barrier drug addiction treatment, prioritizing
medically proven treatment and overdose prevention and
reversal methods and public or private treatment options with an
emphasis on reintegrating recipients into their local
communities; to support overdose prevention education; and to
support job placement, housing, and counseling for those with
substance use disorders. When evaluating grant applications,
agencies and organizations serving populations with the highest
rates of drug related overdose shall be prioritized to receive the
grants
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640)............................... 3,870,000
Total.............................................................$23,659,136

Section 10.915. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for
substance abuse disorder treatment and education programs as
provided by Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri
Constitution, to the Mental Health Reinvestment Fund, provided
the state treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested, and any interest and monies
earned on such investments shall be deposited to the credit of
the Mental Health Reinvestment Fund, and further provided that
any monies remaining in the Mental Health Reinvestment Fund


at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
General Revenue Fund
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640).................................$22,208,596

Section 10.920. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to the Department of Corrections
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for
substance abuse disorder treatment and education programs as
provided by Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri
Constitution, to the Corrections Reinvestment Fund, provided
the state treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested, and any interest and monies
earned on such investments shall be deposited to the credit of
the Corrections Reinvestment Fund, and further provided that
any monies remaining in the Corrections Reinvestment Fund at
the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
General Revenue Fund
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640)..................................$1,803,929

Section 10.925. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for health
and care services for military veterans as provided by Article
XIV, Section 1 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Missouri
Veterans' Homes Fund, and further provided that any monies
remaining in the fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert
to the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Missouri Veterans Health and Care Fund (1606)......................$13,000,000

Section 10.930. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for
substance abuse disorder treatment and education programs as
provided by Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri
Constitution, to the Health Reinvestment Fund, provided the
state treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested, and any interest and monies
earned on such investments shall be deposited to the credit of
the Health Reinvestment Fund, and further provided that any
monies remaining in the Health Reinvestment Fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the General
Revenue Fund


From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608)............$40,018,276
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for public
defenders as provided by Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri
Constitution, to the Public Defender Reinvestment Fund,
provided the state treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in
the same manner as other funds are invested, and any interest
and monies earned on such investments shall be deposited to the
credit of the Public Defender Reinvestment Fund, and further
provided that any monies remaining in the Public Defender
Reinvestment Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608).............51,700,260

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for health
and care services for military veterans as provided by Article
XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Missouri
Veterans' Homes Fund, provided the state treasurer shall invest
monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such
investments shall be deposited to the credit of the Missouri
Veterans’ Homes Fund, and further provided that any monies
remaining in the Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund at the end of
the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the General
Revenue Fund
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608).......... 40,018,276
Total............................................................$131,736,812

Section 10.950. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1
(cid:252)